District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.149

Repealed

Civil actions and prosecutions.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 149
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 242, Pub. L. 86-106, § 17
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 441(e), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.149.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.49.
1973 Ed., § 29-958.